Maine, session 132, LD951.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1017-A, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Disclosure of sources of original funds. A party committee shall comply with
the requirements of section 1065.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §1065 is enacted to read:
§1065. Sources of campaign funds
1. Legislative findings and intent. The Legislature finds and declares that an informed
electorate is the cornerstone of a healthy democracy. Transparency in the funding of
political campaigns is essential to ensuring that voters can make informed decisions and
hold elected officials accountable. The increasing influence of undisclosed financial
contributions, commonly referred to as "dark money," undermines public confidence in the
integrity of elections, distorts the democratic process and conceals the identities of those
seeking to influence public policy for their own interests.
The Legislature further finds that the public has a compelling interest in knowing the
sources of all significant campaign-related expenditures to prevent corruption, undue
influence and the appearance thereof. Full disclosure of political spending promotes
fairness, accountability and trust in government, while safeguarding the fundamental
principle that government derives its legitimacy from the consent of the governed.
It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to require the greatest possible transparency of
campaign expenditures, including the identification of all contributors to entities that spend
or contribute money to influence candidate elections in order to restore public confidence
in elections, protect the integrity of democratic institutions and ensure that the voices of all
citizens, not just the wealthy and powerful, are heard.
2. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Covered committee" means a committee required to file a report under section
1017-A or 1059 that makes, in one election cycle, more than $50,000 in expenditures
and receives a contribution from a covered contributor.
B. "Covered contribution" means the total amount contributed by a covered contributor
to a covered committee in an election cycle.
C. "Covered contributor" means a person that contributes more than $10,000 to a
covered committee in an election cycle.
D. "Election cycle" means the 2-year period beginning the day after a general election
and ending the day of the next general election.
E. "Original funds" means funds over which a person has legal control and to which
the person holds title that the person receives from:
(1) Salary, wages or other earned income from employment;
(2) Investment income, sale of assets or bequests;
(3) Distributions from a partnership, limited liability company or trust in which the
person holds a legal interest;
Page 1 - 132LR0066(01)

(4) Commercial transactions; or
(5) Membership dues, union dues or other similar periodic payments to an
organization, association or group as long as the payments do not exceed $10,000
per year per person.
F. "Original source" means the person who directly received the original funds.
G. "Pass-through funds" means funds over which a person has legal control and to
which the person holds title that are not that person's original funds.
3. Notice to disclose or opt out. A covered committee shall notify each contributor in
writing that the funds may be used to make expenditures to influence a campaign in this
State and that information about the sources of pass-through funds may be required and
reported under this section. The notice may be provided to the contributor before or after
the covered committee receives the contribution, but the contribution may be used or
transferred only in accordance with this subsection and subsection 6. The notice must
provide that the contributor has 21 days in which the contributor may state that those funds
are solely the contributor's original funds, that the funds include pass-through funds or that
the contributor opts out of allowing the funds to be used by the covered committee to
influence a campaign in this State. Any contributor that has not responded to the notice
within 21 days is presumed to have opted out of allowing the contribution to be used to
influence a campaign in this State. The commission shall develop a form that a covered
committee may use to provide the notice required under this subsection.
4. Covered contributor disclosure. If a covered contributor in response to the notice
under subsection 3 states that the funds include pass-through funds, the covered contributor
shall provide the covered committee with the following information:
A. The identity of each source of original funds that directly or indirectly contributed
$2,500 or more in funds included in the contribution;
B. The amounts from each source, which must total at least as much as the
contribution; and
C. The identity of all 3rd parties that transferred $2,500 or more of the original funds
from the original source until the funds were received by the covered contributor,
including the dates and amounts of the transfers.
A covered contributor that received pass-through funds exceeding the amount of the
covered contribution may choose which original sources to disclose as long as the covered
contributor discloses a total amount of original funds at least equal to the amount of the
covered contribution and identifies all persons that transferred those original funds from
the original sources to the covered contributor.
5. Records of disclosures. A covered committee shall maintain records of the
information required under subsection 4 for at least 5 years and provide the records to the
commission upon request.
6. Restrictions. A contribution may be used or transferred by the covered committee
immediately upon the covered committee's receipt of information from the contributor that
states that those funds are solely the contributor's original funds or, if the funds include
pass-through funds, the information required under subsection 4. A covered committee
may not use or transfer funds received from a contributor for the purpose of influencing a
Page 2 - 132LR0066(01)

414 campaign in this State if the contributor has opted out or is presumed to have opted out
425 pursuant to subsection 3. Funds of a contributor that has opted out or is presumed to have
436 opted out pursuant to subsection 3 must be segregated from funds in the covered
447 committee's campaign account described in section 1054. This subsection may not be
458 construed to prohibit the use or transfer of such funds for other purposes.
7. Sources of original funds; report to commission. A covered committee shall
include the following information received from a covered contributor pursuant to
subsection 4 in an appropriate report required under section 1017-A or 1059:
A. The name and mailing address of each original source whose aggregate direct or
indirect contributions exceed $10,000 during the election cycle. For an original source
who is an individual, the report must include that individual's occupation and place of
business;
B. The date and amount of original funds received from each original source identified
in accordance with paragraph A; and
C. The identity of all 3rd parties that transferred $5,000 or more of the original funds
from the original source until the funds were received by the covered committee,
including the dates and amounts of the transfers.
A covered committee is not responsible for reporting the information required by this
subsection for the funds of a covered contributor that has opted out or is presumed to have
opted out pursuant to subsection 3. In reporting the required information under this
subsection, a covered committee may rely upon the information it received pursuant to
subsection 4, unless the covered committee knows or has reason to know that the
information is false or incomplete.
8. Top 3 funders; original sources. For a communication made by a covered
committee that is an independent expenditure, as defined in section 1019-B, subsection 1,
or a communication subject to section 1055-A, the communication must include the
statement described in section 1014, subsection 2-B. The top 3 funders included in the
statement must be the funders that, since the day following the most recent general election,
are the original sources of the highest dollar amounts of original funds directly or indirectly
contributed to the covered committee making the communication. Section 1014,
subsection 2-B, paragraph E does not apply to the statement required by this subsection.
9. Prior funds. For the purposes of disclosing original sources under this section, a
covered contributor that received funds that are not its own original funds prior to January
1, 2026 or that has held an amount of funds at least equal to $10,000 without interruption
for a period of 5 years may consider those funds its own original funds.
10. Penalties. Notwithstanding section 1004-A, subsections 4 and 5 and section 1014,
subsection 4, the commission may assess a penalty for a violation of this section of not
more than $20,000, in addition to any penalty assessed under sections 1020-A and 1062-A.
When determining the amount of any penalty, the commission shall consider the amount
of the original funds not disclosed, the harm suffered by the public from the lack of
disclosure and the covered committee's compliance record. If the commission determines
that adjusting the statutory maximum penalty amount would serve the purposes of this
section, it may recommend adjustments in a report to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over campaign finance reporting matters.
Page 3 - 132LR0066(01)

11. Rules. The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section, including the
content and timing of the notice described in subsection 3 and report described in
subsection 7. Rules adopted under this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. Effective date. That portion of that section of this Act that enacts the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 21-A, section 1065, subsection 10 takes effect January 1, 2026.